bg_CS.dic
ꙗ/ZE	po:pronoun
ꙗкъ/TT	po:pronoun
балуваетъ/V3A1	po:verb
беретъ/V1A1	po:verb
биѥтъ/V3A1	po:verb
блюдетъ/V1A1	po:verb
бодетъ/V1A1	po:verb
боретъ/V3A1	po:verb
будитъ/V4A1	po:verb
бѫдетъ/V1A1	po:verb
валитъ/V4A1SQ	po:verbinf
васъ/LT
везетъ/V1A1SR	po:verb
величитъ/V4A1	po:verbinf
вельрѣчеваетъ/V3A1	po:verbinf
веретъ/V1A1	po:verb
видитъ/V4A1	po:verb
виситъ/V4A1	po:verb
виѥтъ/V3A1	po:verb
влачитъ/V4A1	po:verb
влѣчетъ/V1A1	po:verb
влѧдетъ/V1A1	po:verb
водитъ/SQV4A1	po:verb
воретъ/V3A1	po:verb
вражьдуетъ/V3A1	po:verb
вратитъ/V4A1	po:verb
врьзетъ/SRV1A1	po:verb
въздвигнетъ/V1A1	po:noun
възпѥтъ/V3	po:verb
въпрашаѥтъ/V3A1	po:verb
въскрьснетъ/V1A1	po:verb
вьсакъ/TT
вьсѣго/ZT
вѣдетъ/V1A1SR	po:verb
вѣетъ/V3SQSR	po:verb
вѣлитъ/V4A1	po:verbinf
вѣроуетъ/V3A1	po:verb
вѣситъ/V4SQ	po:verb
вѣститъ/V4SQ	po:verb
гашетъ/V3A1	po:verb
глаголетъ/V3A1SQ	po:verb
гласитъ/V4A1SQ	po:verb
глашаетъ/V3SQ	po:verb
гнететъ/V1A1	po:verb
гниѥтъ/V3A1	po:verb
гнѣтитъ/V4SQ	po:verb
гнѣщаетъ/V3SQ	po:verb
гоститъ/V4A1	po:verb
гребетъ/V1A1SQ	po:verb
грѣшитъ/V4A1	po:verb
грѧдетъ/V3A1	po:verbinf
даруетъ/V3A1	po:verb
двигнетъ/V1A1	po:verb
деретъ/V1A1	po:verb
дрьжитъ/V4A1	po:verb
дъметъ/V1A1	po:verb
дъщи/T5	po:noun
дѣлитъ/V4A1	po:verb
дѣло/NS	po:noun
е/ZE
егда/ZE
его/ZT
естъ/V5A2
жаждетъ/V3A1	po:verb
жежетъ/V1A1	po:verb
женитъ/V4A1	po:verb
жидетъ/V1A1	po:verb
жрьетъ/V1A1	po:verb
жьметъ/V1A1	po:verb
жьнетъ/V3A1	po:verb
зꙑваетъ/V3SQ	po:verb
забꙑваетъ/V3A1	po:verb
задѣваетъ/V3A1	po:verb
зажежетъ/V1A1	po:verb
зане/ZE
запрѣщаетъ/V3A1	po:verb
запрѣщитъ/V4A1	po:verb
звѧжетъ/V1A1	po:verb
зинетъ/V1A1	po:verb
знаетъ/V3A1	po:verb
знаѥтъ/V3A1	po:verb
зоветъ/V1A1	po:verb
зороваетъ/V3A1SR	po:verb
зъветъ/SQV1A1	po:verb
играетъ/V1A1	po:verb
иметъ/V1A1	po:verb
имь/ZE
инъ/TT
исто/NS	po:noun
капетъ/V1A1	po:verb
каплетъ/V3A1	po:verb
каѥтъ/V3A1	po:verb
кладетъ/V1A1	po:verb
кльнетъ/V1A1	po:verb
коветъ/V1A1	po:verb
колетъ/V3A1	po:verb
коло/NS	po:noun
крꙑѥтъ/V3A1	po:verb
крадетъ/V1A1	po:verb
крьститъ/SRV4	po:verb
кѧжетъ/V3A1	po:verb
лежитъ/V4A1	po:verb
летитъ/V4A1	po:verb
ловитъ/V4A1	po:verb
ломитъ/V4A1	po:verb
любитъ/V4A1	po:verb
люто/NS	po:noun
лѧжетъ/V1A1	po:verb
мꙑѥтъ/V3A1	po:verb
мажетъ/V3A1	po:verb
мати/T5	po:noun
маѥтъ/V3A1	po:verb
мелетъ/V3A1	po:verb
мене/MT
мететъ/V1A1SQ	po:verb
млъкнетъ/V1A1	po:verb
мои/ZP
молитъ/V4A1
моѥго/ZT
мъножитъ/V4A1	po:verb
мьнитъ/V4A1	po:verb
мѧтетъ/V1A1SQ	po:verb
мѫтитъ/V4A1	po:verb
мѫчитъ/V4A1	po:verb
навꙑкнетъ/V1A1	po:verb
насъ/LT
нашаетъ/V3SQ	po:verb
нашего/ZT
нашь/ZP
небо/NS	po:noun
несетъ/V1A1SQ	po:verb
носитъ/V4A1	po:verb
ньзетъ/V3A1SQ	po:verb
обуѥтъ/V3A1	po:verb
обѣситъ/V4	po:verb
овъ/TT
оградитъ/V4A1	po:verb
окъ/TT
онъ/TT
орѥтъ/V3A1	po:verb
отънели/ZE
очо/KKNS	po:noun
падетъ/V1A1	po:verb
печетъ/V1A1	po:verb
пишетъ/V3A1	po:verb
пиѥтъ/V3A1	po:verb
плачетъ/V3A1	po:verb
плодитъ/V4A1	po:verb
плъзитъ/V4A1	po:verb
плъзнетъ/V1A1	po:verb
плънитъ/V4A1	po:verb
плюетъ/V3	po:verb
пожидетъ/V1A1	po:verb
поитъ/V4A1	po:verb
поклонитъ/V4A1	po:verb
положитъ/V4A1	po:verb
поне/ZE	po:adverb
почнѥтъ/V3A1	po:verb
проситъ/V4A1	po:verb
простьретъ/V1A1	po:verb
прьетъ/V1A1	po:verb
пущитъ/V4A1	po:verb
пьнетъ/V1A1	po:verb
радитъ/V4A1	po:verb
раститъ/V4SQ	po:verb
речетъ/V1A1	po:verb
ръветъ/V1A1	po:verb
рѣѥтъ/V3A1	po:verb
садитъ/SRV4A1	po:verb
самъ/TT	po:noun
своего/ZT
свои/ZP
себе/MT
сего/ZT
сикъ/TT
скръвитъ/V4A1	po:verb
слꙑшитъ/V4A1	po:verb
слово/NS	po:noun
срамитъ/V4A1	po:verb
стꙑдитъ/V4A1	po:verb
ставитъ/V4A1	po:verb
страждетъ/V3A1	po:verb
стрижетъ/V1A1	po:verb
строитъ/V4A1	po:verb
съ/ZQ
съмотритъ/V4	po:verb
съхнетъ/V1A1	po:verb
сѣчетъ/V1A1	po:verb
сѣѥтъ/V3A1	po:verb
таитъ/V4	po:verb
такъ/TT
таѥтъ/V3A1	po:verb
твоего/ZT
творитъ/V4A1	po:verb
тебе/MT
течетъ/V1A1	po:verb
тлъчетъ/V1A1	po:verb
троветъ/V1A1	po:verb
тръпитъ/V4A1	po:verb
трьетъ/V1A1	po:verb
тъ/TT
тѣло/NSS0	po:noun
тѣмь/ZE
тѧгнетъ/V1A1	po:verb
ушо/KKNS	po:noun
хвалитъ/V4A1	po:verb
хощетъ/V1A1	po:verb
цвьтетъ/V1A1	po:verb
целуетъ/V3A1	po:verb
цѣелитъ/V4A1	po:verb
цѣлитъ/V4A1	po:verb
цѣлѣѥтъ/V3A1SQ	po:verb
чезнетъ/V1A1	po:verb
чиего/ZT
чрьтетъ/V1A1	po:verb
чудо/NS	po:noun
чьтетъ/V1A1SQ	po:verb
шиѥтъ/V3A1	po:verb
ѥго/ZT
ѥдинъ/TT
ѥстъ/V5A2	po:verb
ѩ/ZE
ѫ/ZE
овъторитъ/V4	po:verb
вьсего/ZT
